Utah statutes.
17-27a-707.   Standard of review for appeals.

(1)  A county may, by ordinance, designate the standard of review for appeals of land use authority decisions.

(2)  If the county fails to designate a standard of review of factual matters, the appeal authority shall review the matter de novo.

(3)  The appeal authority shall determine the correctness of a decision of the land use authority in its interpretation and application of a land use ordinance.

(4)  Only those decisions in which a land use authority has applied a land use ordinance to a particular application, person, or parcel may be appealed to an appeal authority.

